District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.22

Board of Veterinary Medicine executive director.

The Mayor shall appoint an executive director to implement and administer the orders of the Board of Veterinary Medicine in accordance with this chapter and the rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 222
as added Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 102(i), 61 DCR 1184

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-96 added this section.